Tennessee, session 114, HB1166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 38, Chapter 1, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
38-1-1001. Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1) "Bullying" means an act committed in a workplace by an employee or
former employee of an employer that operates the workplace and that interferes
with the employment benefits, opportunities, or performance of another person
who is a current employee of the same employer that has the effect of:
(A) Physically harming the other employee or damaging the other
employee's property; or
(B) Knowingly placing the other employee in reasonable fear of
physical harm to the other employee or damage to the other employee's
property;
(2) "Crime of violence" has the same meaning as defined in § 39-17-
1301; and
(3) "Workplace" means a factory, plant, office, or other facility where
employees produce goods or provide services.
38-1-1002. Investigations of bullying in the workplace; reporting.
HB1166
003188
- 1 -

(a) When a law enforcement agency investigates a crime of violence in a
workplace, the investigation must include an inquiry into whether bullying was occurring
in the workplace and whether the crime of violence was a result of, or connected to,
bullying.
(b) A law enforcement agency that conducts an investigation pursuant to
subsection (a) shall report the findings of the inquiry to the Tennessee bureau of
investigation. By July 1, 2026, and by each July 1 thereafter, the Tennessee bureau of
investigation shall compile the findings it receives from law enforcement agencies
pursuant to this subsection (b) into a report on workplace bullying and violence and
submit the report to the senate judiciary committee and the committee of the house of
representatives with subject matter jurisdiction over criminal justice.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 003188